District of Columbia statutes.
3-1432

Commission membership and organization.

(a)

The Commission shall consist of the following commissioners:

(1)

Three commissioners appointed by the Mayor;

(2)

One commissioner appointed by the Council of the District of Columbia;

(3)

One commissioner appointed by the Chief Judge of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia;

(4)

The General Counsel to the Council of the District of Columbia, or his or her designee; and

(5)

Any resident of the District of Columbia who, because of long service in the cause of the uniformity of state legislation, shall have been elected a life member of the NCCUSL.

(b)

To be eligible to serve as a member of the Commission, an individual must be a resident of the District of Columbia and must be a member in good standing of the District of Columbia Bar.

(c)

A commissioner appointed pursuant to subsection (a)(1), (2), or (3) of this section shall serve a term of 3 years, beginning on July 1 of the year of appointment, or until a successor is appointed, whichever is later. A commissioner appointed to fill a vacancy on the Commission shall serve for the unexpired portion of the term, or until a successor is appointed, whichever is later.

(d)

A person serving as a NCCUSL commissioner as of March 12, 2011, may continue to serve until the expiration of his or her term, or until a successor is appointed, whichever occurs later.

Mar. 12, 2011, D.C. Law 18-313, § 3, 57 DCR 12401